Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-360
Least restrictive alternative, defined.

Least restrictive alternative shall mean adult protective services provided in a manner no more restrictive of a vulnerable adult's liberty and no more intrusive than necessary to achieve and ensure essential services.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 13.